Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
PART 1 General Provisions

37-4-100.
Retention of rights and privileges by clients generally; right to due process.

Clients shall retain all rights and privileges granted other persons or citizens. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no person who is receiving or has received services for a developmental disability shall be deprived of any civil,
political, personal, or property rights or be considered legally incompetent for any purpose without due process of law.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-7/HB 228.

Cross references.

Rights of persons generally, T. 1, C. 2.

Capacity of mentally incompetent persons to enter into contracts, §

13-3-24

.

Sterilization of mentally incompetent persons, § 31-20-3.

Testamentary capacity, § 53-4-10 et seq.

37-4-101.
Clients’ right to legal counsel.

It shall be the responsibility of the department to see that every client is given the opportunity to secure legal counsel at his own expense to represent him in connection with private, personal, domestic, business, civil, criminal, and all other legal
matters in which he may be involved during habilitation in a facility.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.15, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1.

Cross references.

Right to legal counsel generally, U.S. Const., amend. 6, and Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. XI.

37-4-102.
Right of clients to communicate with persons outside facility and to receive visitors; treatment of client correspondence; establishment of regulations governing visitation and telephone usage.

Each client in a facility shall have the right to communicate freely and privately with persons outside the facility and to receive visitors inside the facility.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, each client shall be allowed to receive and send sealed, unopened mail; and no client’s incoming or outgoing mail shall be opened, delayed, held, or censored by the facility.

If there are reasonable grounds to believe that incoming mail contains items or substances which may be dangerous to the client or others, the superintendent or regional state hospital administrator may direct reasonable examination of such mail and,
after examination, may regulate the disposition of such items or substances therein found. All writings must be presented to the client within 24 hours of inspection.

The superintendent or regional state hospital administrator may apply to the court for a temporary order to restrict outgoing mail. If the court determines that probable cause exists that such mail is dangerous to the client or others, the court may order
such mail temporarily restricted, provided that a full and fair hearing shall be held within five days after the issuance of such temporary order to determine whether or not an order of restriction for an extended time shall issue.
In no event shall mail be restricted pursuant to such temporary order for more than five days after the date of the temporary order. A full and fair hearing shall be held after the issuance of the temporary order. If, at such hearing,
the client’s outgoing mail is determined to be dangerous to the patient or others, the court may order such mail restricted for an extended period not to exceed 30 days. Restrictions for extended periods may be renewed for additional
periods not to exceed 30 days each, provided that no such restriction shall be renewed except upon a renewed finding, at another full and fair hearing for each such renewal, that such mail is dangerous to the client or others.

If an injunction against the sending of mail by a client is issued by a court, the superintendent or regional state hospital administrator shall restrict outgoing mail as provided by the order of the court.

No restrictions of either incoming or outgoing mail under subsection (c) or (d) of this Code section shall exceed a period of five days, notwithstanding the authority to restrict such mail for longer periods, provided that such restrictions may be continued
as necessary for periods not to exceed five days each upon determination by the superintendent or regional state hospital administrator, prior to each continuation, that such mail continues to be dangerous to the client or others;
provided, further, that, in the case of outgoing mail, such continuation periods in the aggregate shall not exceed the restriction period authorized in the court order.

Correspondence of the client with his attorney shall not be restricted in any manner under this Code section. Correspondence of the client with public officials shall not be restricted in any manner under subsection (c) of this Code section.

Each time a client’s incoming mail is ordered examined by the superintendent or regional state hospital administrator and each time a client’s outgoing mail is ordered examined by a temporary court order, written notice of such order and notice of a right
to a full and fair hearing within five days after such temporary court order shall be served on the client and his representatives as provided in Code Section 37-4-107.

The circumstances surrounding the examination of any mail under subsection (c), (d), (e), or (f) of this Code section shall be recorded on the client’s clinical record.

The superintendent or regional state hospital administrator is authorized to establish reasonable regulations governing visitors, visiting hours, and the use of telephones by clients.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.7, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-19.

37-4-103.
Clients’ rights in regard to personal effects; liability of facility’s employees and staff members for loss of or damage to clients’ personal effects.

A client’s rights to his personal effects shall be respected. The superintendent or regional state hospital administrator may take temporary custody of such effects when required for medical reasons. The facility shall make reasonable efforts to assure
the safety of the client’s belongings, but no employee or staff member shall be responsible for loss of or damage to such property where reasonable safety precautions have been taken.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.8, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-19.

37-4-104.
Clients’ right to vote.

Each client in a facility who is eligible to vote shall be given his right to vote in primary, special, and general elections and in referendums. The superintendent or regional state hospital administrator of each facility shall permit and reasonably
assist clients:

To obtain voter registration forms, applications for absentee ballots, and absentee ballots;

To comply with other requirements which are prerequisite for voting; and

To vote by absentee ballot if necessary.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.9, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 37; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-19.

Cross references.

Right to elective franchise generally, U.S. Const., amend. 15; Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. I, Para. III; and §

1-2-6

.

Absentee voting, §

21-2-380

et seq.

37-4-105.
Employment of clients outside facilities.

If a client wishes to be employed outside a facility and if such employment will aid in the client’s habilitation, he shall be assisted in his efforts to secure suitable employment and all benefits flowing from such employment. The department shall encourage
such employment of clients and shall promote the training of clients for gainful employment after discharge. All benefits of such employment shall accrue solely to the client.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.10, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1.

37-4-106.
Education of children who are clients.

The rights of any child receiving habilitation in a facility to an appropriate education at public expense shall not be abridged during hospitalization, and the special educational needs of each child shall be individually considered and respected. The
department and the State Department of Education shall ensure that education is provided for all clients of school age who are in any state owned, state operated, or any other designated facility.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.11, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1.

37-4-107.
Appointment of client representatives and guardians ad litem; notification provisions; duration and scope of guardianship ad litem.

At the time a client is admitted to any facility under this chapter, that facility shall make diligent efforts to secure the names and addresses of at least two representatives, which names and addresses shall be entered in the client’s clinical record.

The client may designate one representative; the second representative or, in the absence of designation of one representative by the client, both representatives shall be selected by the facility. If the facility is to select both representatives, it
must make one selection from among the following persons in the order of listing: the client’s mental health care agent, legal guardian, spouse, adult child, parent, attorney, adult next of kin, or adult friend. The second representative
shall also be selected from the above list but without regard to the order of listing, provided that the second representative shall not be the person who filed the petition seeking an order for the client to receive services from
the department.

If the facility is unable to secure at least two representatives after diligent search or if the department is the guardian of the client, that fact shall be entered in the client’s clinical record and the facility shall apply to the court in the county
of the client’s residence for the appointment of a guardian ad litem, which guardian ad litem shall not be the department. On application of any person or on its own motion, the court may also appoint a guardian ad litem for a
client for whom two representatives have been named whenever the appointment of a guardian ad litem is deemed necessary for protection of the client’s rights. Such guardian ad litem shall act as representative of the client on
whom notice is to be served under this chapter and shall have the powers granted to representatives by this chapter.

At any time notice is required by this chapter to be given to the client’s representatives, such notice shall be served on the representatives designated under this Code section. The client’s guardian ad litem, if any, shall likewise be served. Unless
otherwise provided, notice may be served in person or by first-class mail. When notice is served by mail, a record shall be made of the date of mailing and shall be placed in the client’s clinical record. Service shall be completed
upon mailing.

At any time notice is required by this chapter to be given to the client, the date on which notice is given shall be entered on the client’s clinical record. If the client is unable to comprehend a written notice, a reasonable effort shall be made to
explain the notice to him or her.

At the time a court enters an order pursuant to this chapter, such order and notice of the date of entry of the order shall be served on the client and his or her representatives as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section.

Notice of a client’s admission to a facility shall be given to his or her representatives in writing.

In every instance in which a court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for any person pursuant to the terms of this chapter, such guardianship shall be for the limited purpose stated in the order of the court and shall expire automatically after 90 days
or after a lesser time stated in the order. The responsibility of the guardian ad litem shall not extend beyond the specific purpose of the appointment.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.18, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 37/HB 942; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-26/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,
effective July 1, 2022, inserted “mental health care agent,” in the second sentence of subsection (b); added “or her” at the end of subsection (e); and inserted “or her” in subsections (f) and (g).

Cross references.

Guardians of incapacitated adults, T. 29, C. 5.

37-4-108.
Right of clients or representatives to petition for writ of habeas corpus and for judicial protection of rights and privileges granted by chapter.

At any time and without notice, a person detained by a facility or a mental health care agent, legal guardian, relative, or friend on behalf of such person may petition as provided by law for a writ of habeas corpus to question the cause and legality
of detention and to request any court of competent jurisdiction on its own initiative to issue a writ for release, provided that in the case of any such petition for the release of a person detained in a facility pursuant to a
court order under Code Section 17-7-130 or 17-7-131, a copy of the petition, along with proper certificate of service, shall also be served upon the presiding judge of the court ordering such detention and the prosecuting attorney
for such court, which service may be made by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested.

A client or his or her representatives may file a petition in the appropriate court alleging that the client is being unjustly denied a right or privilege granted by this chapter or that a procedure authorized by this chapter is being abused. An oral
statement by a client or his or her representatives to any staff member or other service provider alleging that the client’s rights or privileges under this chapter are being violated shall be immediately transmitted to the superintendent,
the regional state hospital administrator, or the administrative head of the facility responsible for the client’s treatment or the other person in charge of the client’s habilitation plan, who shall assist the client in preparing
his or her petition under this Code section. Upon the filing of such a petition, the court shall have the authority to conduct a judicial inquiry and to issue appropriate orders to correct any abuse under this chapter.

History.
Code 1933, §§ 88-2503.14, 88-2505, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 678, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-13; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-27/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,
effective July 1, 2022, substituted “a mental health care agent, legal guardian, relative, or friend” for “a relative or friend” in subsection (a).

Cross references.

Habeas corpus generally, T. 9, C. 14.

Penalty for malicious confinement of sane person in asylum, §

16-5-43

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

37-4-109.
Establishment of patients and staff complaint procedure; final decisionmakers; right of administrative appeal; complaint procedures as alternative to legal remedies.

The department shall establish procedures whereby complaints of the client or complaints of the staff concerning admission, treatment, or habilitation can be speedily heard. Clients shall receive reasonable notice of such procedures. Final decisions shall
be made by the superintendent, the regional state hospital administrator, or an advisory committee, whichever is appropriate, with the right of appeal to the commissioner or his or her designee. The board shall establish rules and
regulations for the implementation of such procedures. However, the client shall not be required to utilize these procedures in lieu of other available legal remedies.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.22, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 37; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-14; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-15/HB 228.

Cross references.

Reports and investigations regarding mistreatment of hospital patients, residents of long-term care facilities, and others, §§ 31-7-9, 31-8-50 et seq., 31-8-80 et seq., 31-8-100 et seq.

37-4-110.
[Effective until July 1, 2023. See note.] Appeal rights of clients, their representatives, or attorneys; payment of costs of appeal; right of client to subsequent appeal and to legal counsel on appeal.

The client, the client’s representatives, or the client’s attorney may appeal any order of the probate court or administrative law judge rendered in a proceeding under this chapter to the superior court of the county in which the proceeding was held,
except as otherwise provided in Article 6 of Chapter 9 of Title 15, and may appeal any order of the juvenile court rendered in a proceeding under this chapter to the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court. The appeal to the superior
court shall be made in the same manner as appeals from the probate court to the superior court, except that the appeal shall be heard before the court sitting without a jury as soon as practicable but not later than 30 days following
the date on which the appeal is filed with the clerk of the superior court. The appeal from the order of the juvenile court to the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court shall be as provided by law but shall be heard as expeditiously
as possible. The client must pay all costs upon filing any appeal authorized under this Code section or must make an affidavit that he or she is unable to pay costs. The client shall retain all rights of review of any order of the
superior court, the Court of Appeals, or the Supreme Court as provided by law. The client shall have a right to counsel or, if unable to afford counsel, shall have counsel appointed for the client by the court. The appeal rights provided
to the client, the client’s representatives, or the client’s attorney in this Code section are in addition to any other appeal rights which the parties may have, and the provision of the right for the client, the client’s representatives,
or the client’s attorney to appeal does not deny the right to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities to appeal under the general appeal provisions of Code Sections 5-3-2 and 5-3-3.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.19, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 12; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1072, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 37; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 337, § 8/HB 324; Ga. L. 2016,
p. 883, §§ 3-13, 3-14/HB 927.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 37-4-110 is set out twice in this Code. This version is effective until July 1, 2023. For version effective July 1, 2023, see the following version.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 25, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that that Act would apply to all cases filed on or after July 1, 1986.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 883, § 1-1/HB 927, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Appellate Jurisdiction Reform Act of 2016.’ ”

Ga. L. 2016, p. 883, § 6-1/HB 927, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Part III of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2017, and shall apply to cases in which a notice of appeal or application to appeal is filed on or after
such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 205 (2016).

37-4-110.
[Effective July 1, 2023. See note.] Appeal rights of clients, their representatives, or attorneys; payment of costs of appeal; right of client to subsequent appeal and to legal counsel on appeal.

The client, the client’s representatives, or the client’s attorney may appeal any order of the probate court or administrative law judge rendered in a proceeding under this chapter to the superior court of the county in which the proceeding was held,
except as otherwise provided in Article 6 of Chapter 9 of Title 15, and may appeal any order of the juvenile court rendered in a proceeding under this chapter to the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court. The appeal to the superior
court shall be made in the same manner as appeals from the probate court to the superior court, except that the appeal shall be heard before the court sitting without a jury as soon as practicable but not later than 30 days following
the date on which the appeal is filed with the clerk of the superior court. The appeal from the order of the juvenile court to the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court shall be as provided by law but shall be heard as expeditiously
as possible. The client must pay all costs upon filing any appeal authorized under this Code section or must make an affidavit that he or she is unable to pay costs. The client shall retain all rights of review of any order of the
superior court, the Court of Appeals, or the Supreme Court as provided by law. The client shall have a right to counsel or, if unable to afford counsel, shall have counsel appointed for the client by the court. The appeal rights provided
to the client, the client’s representatives, or the client’s attorney in this Code section are in addition to any other appeal rights which the parties may have, and the provision of the right for the client, the client’s representatives,
or the client’s attorney to appeal does not deny the right to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities to appeal under the general appeal provisions of Code Section 5-3-4.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.19, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 12; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1072, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 37; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 337, § 8/HB 324; Ga. L. 2016,
p. 883, §§ 3-13, 3-14/HB 927; Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 2-28/HB 916.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 37-4-110 is set out twice in this Code. This version, as set out above, is effective July 1, 2023. For version effective until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version.

The 2022 amendment,
effective July 1, 2023, substituted “Code Section 5-3-4” for “Code Sections 5-3-2 and 5-3-3” at the end of this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 3-1/HB 916, not codified by the General Assembly, makes this Code section applicable to petitions for review filed in superior or state court on or after July 1, 2023.